North Carolina statutes. Chapter 112. Confederate Homes and Pensions. [Repealed]
§§ 112-1 through 112-37.
[Repealed]

Repealed.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1945, c. 699, s. 2, effective December 31, 1944, repealed

G.S. 112-1

7. Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 166, effective July 1, 1973, repealed G.S. 112-2, 112-4, and 112-6. Session Laws 1981, c. 462, s. 1, effective July 1, 1981, repealed

G.S. 112-1

and 112-3. Session Laws 1993, c. 257, s. 10, effective July 1, 1993, repealed G.S. 112-5 through 112-37.

Session Laws 1993, c. 539, s. 826, as amended by Session Laws 1994, Extra Session, c. 24, s. 14(c), would have amended G.S. 112-32, effective October 1, 1994, to designate the offense of speculating in pension claims a Class 1 misdemeanor. However, G.S. 112-32 was repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 257, s. 10, effective July 1, 1993.

Session Laws 1993, c. 539, s. 827, as amended by Session Laws 1994, Extra Session, c. 24, s. 14(c), would have amended G.S. 112-36, effective October 1, 1994, to designate the offense of taking fees for acknowledgments by pensioners a Class 3 misdemeanor. However, G.S. 112-36 was repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 257, s. 10, effective July 1, 1993.